Massachusetts, session 194th, H4767.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
2 following section:-
3 Section 250. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
4 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
5 “Bodily injury”, substantial impairment of the physical condition, including, but not
6 limited to, any burn, fracture of any bone, subdural hematoma, injury to any internal organ or
7 any injury which occurs as the result of repeated harm to any bodily function or organ, including
8 human skin.
1 of 14

9 “Employee”, an individual employed by or under contract for employment with an
10 independent entity or a third-party vendor at a health care facility, by a health care employer,
11 who is providing health care services at, volunteering at or participating in an educational course
12 of instruction at a health care facility.
13 “Health care employer”, any individual, partnership, association, corporation, trust or any
14 person or group of persons operating a health care facility.
15 “Health care facility”, a hospital licensed under section 51, the teaching hospital of the
16 University of Massachusetts medical school established under section 1 of chapter 75,
17 Bridgewater State Hospital established under chapter 123 that is operated by the department of
18 correction and under contract with a private company for health services, or any state acute care
19 facility, non-acute care facility, continuing care facility or group home operated, funded or
20 subject to oversight by the department of public health, the department of mental health or the
21 department of developmental services; provided, that a facility with more than 1 license or that is
22 licensed to provide multiple services shall be considered a health care facility if the facility is
23 licensed in at least 1 of the included categories; and provided further, that health care facilities
24 shall not include: (i) a nursing home or rest home licensed pursuant to section 71; (ii) a clinic,
25 mobile or portable clinic or clinic satellite licensed pursuant to section 51; (iii) a home health
26 agency certified pursuant to section 51K; (iv) an adult day health program licensed pursuant to
27 105 CMR 158.00; (v) a hospice program or hospice inpatient satellite licensed pursuant to
28 section 57D; (vi) an ambulatory surgical center licensed pursuant to section 51; (vii) a renal
29 dialysis facility licensed pursuant to section 51; (viii) an outpatient physical therapy or speech
30 pathology facility licensed pursuant to section 23M1/2 of chapter 112; or (ix) a nursing pool
31 agency licensed pursuant to section 72Y.
2 of 14

32 “Serious bodily injury”, bodily injury which results in a permanent disfigurement,
33 protracted loss or impairment of a bodily function, limb or organ or substantial risk of death.
34 “Workplace violence”, conduct at the work site that: (i) is an unpermitted or harmful
35 touching of another person; (ii) is an attempt or act to use some degree of physical force on
36 another person; or (iii) could be reasonably perceived as an intent to touch without permission,
37 use immediate physical force or injure a particular person now or in the future, that if carried out
38 would constitute a crime, and that causes another person to reasonably believe that the person
39 has the intent and ability to carry out such conduct.
40 (b) Annually, each health care employer shall perform a facility-specific risk assessment
41 that shall include, but shall not be limited to, the standards determined by the department, in
42 consultation with the office of health equity. The facility-specific risk assessment shall be
43 performed in cooperation with the employees of the health care employer and any labor
44 organization representing the employees, examining all factors that may put any of the
45 employees at risk of workplace violence. The factors shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i)
46 working in public settings; (ii) guarding or maintaining property or possessions; (iii) working in
47 high-crime areas; (iv) working late night or early morning hours; (v) working alone or in small
48 numbers; (vi) uncontrolled public access to the workplace; (vii) working in public areas where
49 people are in crisis; (viii) working in areas where a patient or resident may exhibit violent
50 behavior; (ix) working in areas with known security problems; and (x) working with insufficient
51 qualified staff in 1 or more position titles to address foreseeable risk factors.
52 (c) Based on the findings of the risk assessment in subsection (b), the health care
53 employer shall develop and implement a program to minimize the danger of workplace violence
3 of 14

54 to employees, which shall include, but shall not be limited to, appropriate employee training and
55 a system for the ongoing reporting and monitoring of incidents and situations involving violence
56 or the risk of violence. Employee training shall include, but shall not be limited to, in addition to
57 all employer training program policies, methods of reporting to appropriate public safety
58 officials, bodies or agencies and processes necessary for the filing of criminal charges.
59 (d) Each health care employer shall develop a written plan setting forth the employer’s
60 workplace violence prevention plan. The health care employer shall make the plan available to
61 each employee and provide the plan to any of its employees upon written request. The health
62 care employer shall provide, upon written request, the plan to any labor organization or
63 organizations representing any of its employees. The plan shall include, but shall not be limited
64 to: (i) a list of those factors and circumstances that may pose a danger to employees; (ii) a
65 description of the methods that the health care employer will use to alleviate hazards associated
66 with each factor, including, but not limited to, employee training and any appropriate changes in
67 job design, staffing, security, equipment or facilities; (iii) a post-incident debriefing process with
68 affected staff; and (iv) a description of the reporting and monitoring system.
69 (e) Each health care employer shall designate a senior manager responsible for the
70 development and support of an in-house crisis response team for employee victims of workplace
71 violence. The in-house crisis response team shall implement an assaulted staff action program
72 that shall include, but shall not be limited to, group crisis interventions, individual crisis
73 counseling, staff victims’ support groups, employee victims’ family crisis intervention, peer-help
74 and professional referrals.
4 of 14

75 (f) Any health care employer who violates this section, or any regulation promulgated by
76 the department under authority of this section may, based on the reason for the violation and the
77 discretion of the department, be punished by a fine of not more than $2,000 for each offense. The
78 department or its representative, any aggrieved employee, any interested party or any officer of
79 any labor union or association, whether incorporated or otherwise, may file a written complaint
80 with the district court in the jurisdiction of which the violation occurs and shall promptly notify
81 the attorney general in writing of such complaint. The attorney general, upon determination that
82 there is a violation of any workplace standard relative to the protection of the occupational health
83 and safety of employees or of any standard of requirement of licensure, may order any health
84 care facility to be closed by way of the issuance of a cease and desist order enforceable in the
85 appropriate courts of the commonwealth.
86 (g) No employee shall be penalized by a health care employer in any way as a result of
87 such employee’s filing of a complaint or otherwise providing notice to the department in regard
88 to the occupational health and safety of such employee or their fellow employees exposed to
89 workplace violence risk factors.
90 (h) Each health care employer shall submit a report annually, on a form prescribed by the
91 commissioner, of all incidents of workplace violence reported to the health care employer that
92 occurred at the health care facility on an employee, an emergency medical technician, an
93 ambulance operator or an ambulance attendant. The report shall be submitted to the department
94 and the office of the district attorney for the county where the health care facility is located. Not
95 more than 90 days after receiving the reports, the department shall make the aggregate data
96 publicly available by county and statewide; provided, that the department shall categorize the
5 of 14

97 aggregate data by occupation and incident type. The department shall create a form that meets
98 the requirements of this section and shall require its use by each health care employer.
99 SECTION 2. Chapter 149 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
100 section 52E the following section:-
101 Section 52F. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall, unless the
102 context clearly indicates otherwise, have the following meanings:
103 “Employee”, an individual employed by a health care employer.
104 “Health care employer”, any individual, partnership, association, corporation, trust or any
105 person or group of persons operating a health care facility.
106 “Health care facility”, a hospital licensed under section 51 of chapter 111, the teaching
107 hospital of the University of Massachusetts medical school established under section 1 of chapter
108 75, Bridgewater State Hospital established under chapter 123 that is operated by the department
109 of correction and under contract with a private company for health services, or any state acute
110 care facility, non-acute care facility, continuing care facility or group home operated, funded or
111 subject to oversight by the department of public health, the department of mental health or the
112 department of developmental services; provided, that a facility with more than 1 license or that is
113 licensed to provide multiple services, shall be considered a health care facility if the facility is
114 licensed in at least 1 of the included categories; and provided further, that health care facilities
115 shall not include: (i) a nursing home or rest home licensed pursuant to section 71 of chapter 111;
116 (ii) a clinic, mobile or portable clinic, or clinic satellite licensed pursuant to section 51 of chapter
117 111; (iii) a home health agency certified pursuant to section 51K of chapter 111; (iv) an adult day
118 health program licensed pursuant to 105 CMR 158.00; (v) a hospice program or hospice
6 of 14

119 inpatient satellite licensed pursuant to section 57D of chapter 111; (vi) an ambulatory surgical
120 center licensed pursuant to section 51 of chapter 111; (vii) a renal dialysis facility licensed
121 pursuant to section 51 of chapter 111; (viii) an outpatient physical therapy or speech pathology
122 facility licensed pursuant to section 23M1/2 of chapter 112; and (ix) a nursing pool agency
123 licensed pursuant to section 72Y of chapter 111.
124 (b) A health care employer shall permit an employee to take paid leave from work if the
125 employee: (i) is a victim of assault or assault and battery and such assault or assault and battery
126 causes bodily injury or serious bodily injury, as those terms are defined in section 250 of chapter
127 111, which occurred in the line of duty; and (ii) uses the leave to seek or obtain medical
128 treatment, victim services or legal assistance, obtain a protective order from a court, appear in
129 court or before a grand jury or meet with a district attorney or other law enforcement official.
130 (c)(1) An employee seeking leave under this section shall not be required to use annual
131 leave, vacation leave, personal leave or sick leave available to the employee, prior to requesting
132 or taking leave under this section. Nothing within this section shall interfere with any employee’s
133 entitlement to eligible paid family and medical leave under chapter 175M.
134 (2) No health care employer shall require an employee to exhaust all annual leave,
135 vacation leave, personal leave or sick leave available to the employee prior to requesting or
136 taking leave under this section; provided, that said paid leave shall be concurrent with paid
137 family and medical leave under chapter 175M.
138 (d) A health care employer may require an employee to provide documentation
139 evidencing that the employee is a victim of assault or assault and battery sustained in the line of
140 duty and that the leave taken is consistent with the conditions of subsections (b) and (c). An
7 of 14

141 employee shall provide such documentation to the health care employer within 5 business days
142 after the health care employer requests documentation relative to the employee’s absence.
143 (e) An employee seeking leave from work pursuant to subsection (b) shall provide
144 advance notice of the leave to the health care employer in accordance with the health care
145 employer’s leave policy; provided, however, that if an employee is absent on an unauthorized
146 basis, the health care employer shall not take any negative action against the employee if the
147 employee, within 30 days from the unauthorized absence or within 30 days from the last
148 unauthorized absence in the instance of consecutive days of unauthorized absences, provides
149 documentation that the unauthorized absence meets the criteria of subsection (b).
150 (f) All information related to the employee’s leave taken pursuant to this section shall be
151 kept confidential by the health care employer and shall not be disclosed, except to the extent that
152 disclosure is: (i) requested or consented to, in writing, by the employee; (ii) ordered to be
153 released by a court of competent jurisdiction; (iii) required by federal or state law; (iv) required
154 in the course of an investigation authorized by law enforcement, including, but not limited to, an
155 investigation by the attorney general; or (v) necessary to protect the safety of the employee or
156 others employed at the workplace.
157 (g) No health care employer shall coerce, interfere with, restrain or deny the exercise of,
158 or any attempt to exercise, any rights provided by this section or to make leave requested or
159 taken pursuant to this section contingent upon whether or not the victim maintains contact with
160 the alleged abuser.
161 (h) No health care employer shall discharge or in any other manner discriminate against
162 an employee for exercising the employee’s rights under this section. An employee who takes
8 of 14

163 leave under this section shall not lose any employment benefit accrued prior to the date on which
164 the leave taken under this section commenced as a result of taking said leave. Upon the
165 employee’s return from said leave, the employee shall be entitled to restoration to the
166 employee’s original job or to an equivalent position.
167 (i) Each health care employer shall post in a conspicuous place within the health care
168 facility a notice prepared by the department indicating the rights and responsibilities provided by
169 this section. The notice shall be issued in English, Spanish, Chinese, Haitian Creole, Italian,
170 Portuguese, Vietnamese, Laotian, Khmer, Russian and any other language that is the primary
171 language of at least 10,000 or one half of 1 per cent of all residents of the commonwealth. The
172 required workplace notice shall be in English and each language other than English which is the
173 primary language of 5 or more employees or self-employed individuals of that workplace, if such
174 notice is available from the department. Each health care employer shall notify each employee
175 not later than 30 days after the beginning date of the employee’s employment of the rights and
176 responsibilities provided by this section, including those related to notification requirements and
177 confidentiality.
178 (j) This section shall not be construed to exempt a health care employer from complying
179 with chapter 258B, section 14B of chapter 268 or any other general or special law or to limit the
180 rights of any employee under chapter 258B, section 14B of chapter 268 or any other general or
181 special law.
182 (k) The division of labor standards, in consultation with the attorney general, may
183 promulgate regulations to carry out this section.
9 of 14

184 SECTION 3. Section 13I of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
185 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 5, the words “treating or transporting
186 a person”.
187 SECTION 4. Said section 13I of said chapter 265, as so appearing, is hereby further
188 amended by adding the following paragraph:-
189 Any emergency medical technician, ambulance operator or ambulance attendant who is
190 the victim of assault or assault and battery while in the line of duty and who is an employee of a
191 health care facility shall be given the option of providing the address of the health care facility at
192 which they are employed. Any emergency medical technician, ambulance operator or ambulance
193 attendant who is the victim of assault or assault and battery while in the line of duty and is a
194 member in good standing of a labor organization shall be given the option of providing the
195 address of the labor organization in which they are a member in good standing. In instances
196 where the address of the health care facility or labor organization in which the employee is a
197 member in good standing is used, the health care facility or labor organization shall ensure that
198 the individual receives any documents pertaining to the assault or assault and battery within 24
199 hours of receipt by the health care facility or labor organization. The health care facility or labor
200 organization shall demonstrate that it has provided any and all documentation by obtaining a
201 signature from the individual acknowledging receipt. For purposes of this paragraph, the term
202 “employee” and the term “health care facility” shall be as defined in section 250 of chapter 111.
203 SECTION 5. Said chapter 265 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 13I
204 the following section:-
10 of 14

205 Section 13I ½. Whoever knowingly and intentionally commits an assault or an assault
206 and battery on an employee, as defined in section 250 of chapter 111, while in the line of duty,
207 and by such assault and battery causes bodily injury, as defined in said section 250 of said
208 chapter 111, shall be punished by imprisonment in state prison for not more than 5 years or
209 imprisonment in a jail or house of correction for not more than 2 and one-half years or by a fine
210 of not less than $500 nor more than $5,000, or any combination of said fines and imprisonment.
211 Whoever knowingly and intentionally commits an assault or an assault and battery on an
212 employee, as defined in said section 250 of said chapter 111, while in the line of duty, and by
213 such assault and battery causes serious bodily injury, as defined in said section 250 of said
214 chapter 111, shall be punished by imprisonment in state prison for not more than 10 years or
215 imprisonment in a jail or house of correction for not more than 2 and one-half years or by a fine
216 of not less than $500 nor more than $5,000, or any combination of said fines and imprisonment.
217 Any employee, as defined in section 52F of chapter 149, who is the victim of assault or
218 assault and battery at a health care facility, as defined in section 250 of chapter 111, while in the
219 line of duty, shall be given the option of providing the address of the health care facility where
220 the assault or assault and battery occurred or providing the address of the labor organization in
221 which they are a member in good standing. In instances where the address of the health care
222 facility or labor organization in which the employee is a member in good standing is used, the
223 health care facility or labor organization shall ensure that the individual receives any documents
224 pertaining to the assault or assault and battery within 24 hours of receipt by the health care
225 facility or labor organization. The health care facility or labor organization shall demonstrate that
226 it has provided any and all documentation by obtaining a signature from the individual
227 acknowledging receipt.
11 of 14

228 SECTION 6. The commissioner of public health, in consultation with the commissioner
229 of correction, the commissioner of developmental services and the commissioner of mental
230 health, shall promulgate regulations within 180 days of the effective date of this act necessary to
231 implement and enforce the purposes of section 250 of chapter 111 of the General Laws.
232 SECTION 7. The division of labor standards, in consultation with the attorney general,
233 shall promulgate regulations within 180 days of the effective date of this act necessary to
234 implement and enforce the purposes of section 52F of chapter 149 of the General Laws.
235 SECTION 8. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law or rule or regulation to the
236 contrary, not later than 1 year of the effective date of this act, the executive office of health and
237 human services, in coordination with the executive office of public safety and security, shall
238 submit a report to the joint committee on health care financing, the president of the
239 Massachusetts Health and Hospital Association, Inc., the president of the Massachusetts Nurses
240 Association and the president of 1199 SEIU with recommendations to improve interagency data
241 sharing, communication and collaboration between health care facilities, as defined in section
242 250 of chapter 111 of the General Laws, and public safety and law enforcement entities to
243 address alternative appropriate placement for criminal justice involved patients with a mental
244 health or behavioral health diagnosis.
245 (b) The report shall include, but shall not be limited to, recommendations that address the
246 following:
247 (i) allowing health care facilities to access reports on individuals maintained by agencies
248 within each department of said executive offices through a secure electronic medical record,
249 health information exchange, or other similar software or information system connected to health
12 of 14

250 care facilities, for the purposes of improving ease of access and utilization of such data for
251 treatment and diagnosis, and supporting integration of such data within a patient’s electronic
252 health record for purposes of treatment or diagnosis;
253 (ii) expansion of safe and appropriate state-operated alternative placement options for
254 patients presenting in health care facilities in acute mental health or behavioral health crisis and
255 for whom all reasonable clinical interventions have been unsuccessful, and other alternatives,
256 such as transfer to a more secure hospital, are unavailable;
257 (iii) identifying and establishing new pathways to enter patients into the department of
258 mental health continuing care system or similar treatment that do not require an arrest; and
259 (iv) any further considerations necessary to fulfill the obligations of the report.
260 (c) Any recommendations for interagency data sharing under this section shall address
261 the following:
262 (i) limiting access to identifiable information to the minimum necessary data elements
263 required to accomplish a specific and defined public safety or workplace violence prevention
264 purpose;
265 (ii) ensuring that, whenever practicable, data exchanged between agencies is de-identified
266 or aggregated, and that identifiable information shall be shared only when essential for treatment,
267 diagnosis or immediate safety purposes;
268 (iii) prohibiting the use of identifiable information obtained pursuant to this section to
269 initiate or support criminal, civil, regulatory, licensing or administrative actions against an
270 individual or entity, except as expressly authorized by this act;
13 of 14

271 (iv) requiring appropriate safeguards, access controls, logging and auditing of all data
272 access and use;
273 (v) providing that any misuse or unauthorized access to such information shall be subject
274 to penalties, which may include enforcement under chapter 93A; and
275 (vi) preserving all rights and obligations under federal law, including but not limited to
276 the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, 42 CFR Part 2 and any other
277 applicable federal confidentiality requirement.
278 (d) Nothing in this section shall compel any health care facility or agency to disclose
279 information in violation of federal law or to waive privileges or protections otherwise provided
280 by state or federal law.
14 of 14